Hawaii statutes.
[§457-5.5] Nursys; verification of nurse
license. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the board of
nursing may fully participate in Nursys by sharing licensure and discipline
data with Nursys. By applying for nurse licensure, individuals shall consent
to allowing the board to share their licensure and discipline data with Nursys.
[L 2016, c 18, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next